Hawaii, session 2026, SB710.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that in 2022, the auditor was requested to conduct a performance audit of the child welfare services branch of the department of human services (department), pursuant to senate concurrent resolution 102 S.D. 1 H.D. 1.  In April 2024, the auditor published report no. 24‑05, finding that the department's process to license child-specific homes did not comply with legal requirements and that the department failed to monitor or evaluate the performance of its contractor hired to complete documentation necessary for licensing, ultimately putting children at risk. The legislature also finds that, pursuant to Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, the malama ohana working group was established to improve the child welfare system by seeking, designing, and recommending transformative changes to the State's existing child welfare system.  The malama ohana working group published its final report with various recommendations on December 9, 2024. The legislature further finds that the senate committee on health and human services conducted an informational briefing on November 21, 2024, to address the April 2024 state audit of child welfare services and concerns regarding the child welfare system in Hawaii.  The informational briefing agenda included highlights from the audit, recommendations from the malama ohana working group, a review of the 2016 East Hawaii pilot program, and a status update from the department of human services regarding efforts to increase recruitment of foster families and social workers. The legislature notes that the informational briefing highlighted persistent shortcomings in Hawaii's child welfare system and recognizes that there is an urgent need for systemic change. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to convene a child welfare task force to develop strategies and policy changes to transform and improve the State's child welfare system. SECTION 2. (a)  There is established within the department of human services, for administrative purposes only, a child welfare task force to develop strategies and policy changes to transform and improve the State's child welfare system, including consideration of the recommendations of the malama ohana working group, pursuant to Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023. (b)  The department of human services shall fully cooperate with the child welfare task force in carrying out its duties, including providing any requested information in accordance with federal and state law, and shall provide support or other assistance as reasonably requested.  The task force may consult with other persons and organizations as necessary to carry out its duties pursuant to this Act. (c)  The members of the child welfare task force shall include the following individuals or their designees: (1)  The chair of the senate standing committee having primary subject-matter jurisdiction over the department of human services, who shall serve as co‑chair; (2)  The chair of the house of representatives standing committee having primary subject-matter jurisdiction over the department of human services, who shall serve as co-chair; (3)  The attorney general; (4)  The director of human services; (5)  The director of human resources development; (6)  The executive director of the office of wellness and resilience; (7)  The insurance commissioner; and (8)  Members of the malama ohana working group, pursuant to Act 86, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023. (d) The members of the child welfare task force shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. (e) The child welfare task force shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular session of 2026. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $300,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 for the child welfare task force to carry out its duties pursuant to this Act, including incidental costs and potential consultancy fees. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of human services for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________